Hawaii, session 2026, HB631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 421J, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§421J- Application fees for improvements prohibited.  Except as otherwise authorized under this chapter, no association shall require a unit owner to pay a filing fee, application fee, or other similar fee, when applying to improve, alter, repair, or renovate a portion of the unit owner's unit or other real property, including an exterior portion of the unit." SECTION 2.  Chapter 514B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§514B- Application fees for improvements prohibited.  Except as otherwise authorized under this chapter, no association shall require a unit owner to pay a filing fee, application fee, or other similar fee, when applying to improve, alter, repair, or renovate a portion of the unit owner's unit or other real property, including an exterior portion of the unit." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________